Hawaii statutes.
§490:8-305 Instruction. (a) If an
instruction has been originated by an appropriate person but is incomplete in
any other respect, any person may complete it as authorized and the issuer may
rely on it as completed, even though it has been completed incorrectly.

(b) Unless otherwise agreed, a person
initiating an instruction assumes only the obligations imposed by section
490:8-108 and not an obligation that the security will be honored by the
issuer. [L 1997, c 33, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next